District of Columbia statutes.
31-3451.12

Notices.

All notices by the Commissioner to a health organization that may result in regulatory action under this chapter shall be effective upon mailing if transmitted by registered or certified mail or, in the case of any other transmission, shall be effective upon the health organization’s receipt of notice.

June 18, 2003, D.C. Law 14-312, § 112, 50 DCR 306
2001 Ed., § 31-3851.12.